Maryland, session 2025, SB0264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
5–309.
(a) (1) At least once each year the Secretary shall inspect each nursery in the
State to determine if the nursery stock is infested or infected with dangerously injurious
plant pests.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0264*

SENATE BILL 264
(2) Each nursery shall pay the Secretary an inspection fee based [upon]
ON the number of acres in production AS FOLLOWS:
(I) 1 acre or less, [$10] $20; [more]
(II) MORE than 1 acre to 5 acres, [$20] $30; [more]
(III) MORE than 5 acres to 10 acres, [$30] $40; [more] AND
(IV) MORE than 10 acres, [$3] $5 for each acre, or part of any acre,
up to a maximum of [$1,000] $1,500.
(3) All fees collected UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION shall
be [placed in] DEPOSITED INTO the Plant Protection Fund and used to defray partially
the cost of inspecting the nurseries.
(b) (1) Each nursery shall be certified annually by the Secretary if it meets
standards established by the Department regarding freedom from plant pests and [upon]
ON payment of a fee of [$100] $150.
(2) All fees collected UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION shall
be [placed in] DEPOSITED INTO the Plant Protection Fund and used to defray partially
the cost of inspecting and certifying the nurseries.
(c) (1) Each broker or dealer shall comply with the regulations established by
the Department and shall pay an annual license fee of [$100] $150.
(2) The Secretary may inspect annually the nursery stock in a sales or
holding yard of a broker or dealer.
(3) Each broker or dealer shall pay the Secretary an inspection fee as
provided in subsection (a) of this section.
(4) All fees collected UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION shall
be [placed in] DEPOSITED INTO the Plant Protection Fund and used to defray partially
the cost of inspecting and licensing the brokers and dealers.
(d) (1) The Secretary may certify plants [to]:
(I) TO be apparently free of injurious viruses[, and/or] OR other
diseases[, or plants that]; OR
(II) THAT conform to established standards of strain purity.

SENATE BILL 264 3
(2) Each plant producer shall pay the Secretary [the following] A
certification fee for each acre, or part of an acre, in plant production AS FOLLOWS:
[strawberry]
(I) STRAWBERRY plants, “Cape” American beachgrass, “Avalon”
Saltmeadow cordgrass, $50; [grape] AND
(II) GRAPE vines, fruit trees, and bramble plants, $70.
(3) All fees collected UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION shall
be [placed in] DEPOSITED INTO the Plant Protection Fund and used to defray partially
the cost of virus indexing, inspection, and analysis of plants certified or tagged.
(e) (1) If dangerously injurious plant pests are found in any nursery, orchard,
or any premises where nursery stock is grown or held for sale, the Secretary shall order it
treated or destroyed by the [nurseryman] NURSERY or dealer. [He]
(2) THE SECRETARY shall release all other nursery stock grown on the
premises, and issue a certificate of inspection to the owner.
(3) If the [nurseryman] NURSERY or dealer fails to comply with the order,
the Secretary shall seize, destroy, [and/or] OR treat the infested or infected nursery stock
and the owner shall pay the costs.
(4) If [the] AN owner refuses to pay the [cost] COSTS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, [it] THE COSTS shall be collected [as prescribed]
in ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–307 of this subtitle.
(f) A federal, State, or local public agency is exempt from the license and
inspection fees required by this section.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2026, AND EACH JANUARY 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF CURRENT LICENSEES;
(2) THE NUMBER OF INSPECTIONS CONDUCTED DURING THE
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, DIVIDED BY COUNTY;
(3) INFORMATION ON THE DISEASES AND PESTS IDENTIFIED; AND

SENATE BILL 264
(4) THE NUMBER OF COMPLIANCE AGREEMENTS THE DEPARTMENT
HAS ENTERED INTO.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.